Massachusetts, session 194th, S79.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 94I of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Debilitating medical 
condition” and inserting in place thereof the following definition:-   
“Debilitating medical condition”, cancer, glaucoma, positive status for human 
immunodeficiency virus, acquired immune deficiency syndrome, hepatitis C, amyotrophic lateral 
sclerosis, Crohn's disease, Parkinson's disease, multiple sclerosis, post-traumatic stress disorder, 
opioid use disorder, and other conditions as determined in writing by a registered qualifying 
patient's registered healthcare professional.   

of 2 9  SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said chapter 94I of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
hereby further amended by striking out the definition of “Qualifying patient” and inserting in 
place thereof the following definition:-    
“Qualifying patient”, (1) a person who has been diagnosed by a registered healthcare 
professional as having a debilitating medical condition, or (2) a veteran receiving their health 
care at a federal Veterans Administration facility who provides documentation from the Veterans 
Administration indicating a diagnosis of a debilitating medical condition.